Utah statutes.
11-46-302.   Definitions.

In addition to the definitions in Sections 11-46-102 and 11-46-202, as used in this part:

(1)  "Community cat" means a feral or free-roaming cat that is without visibly discernable or microchip owner identification of any kind, and has been sterilized, vaccinated, and ear-tipped.

(2)  "Community cat caretaker" means any person other than an owner who provides food, water, or shelter to a community cat or community cat colony.

(3)  "Community cat colony" means a group of cats that congregate together.  Although not every cat in a colony may be a community cat, any cats owned by individuals that congregate with a colony are considered part of it.

(4)  "Community cat program" means a program pursuant to which feral cats are sterilized, vaccinated against rabies, ear-tipped, and returned to the location where they congregate.

(5)  "Ear-tipping" means removing approximately a quarter-inch off the tip of a cat's left ear while the cat is anesthetized for sterilization.

(6)  "Feral" has the same meaning as in Section 23-13-2.

(7)  "Sponsor" means any person or organization that traps feral cats, sterilizes, vaccinates against rabies, and ear-tips them before returning them to the location where they were trapped.  A sponsor may be any animal humane society, non-profit organization, animal rescue, adoption organization, or a designated community cat caretaker that also maintains written records on community cats.



Enacted by Chapter 130, 2011 General Session

